Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-823
Rules and regulations.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing the operation of any public transit system of the regional metropolitan transit authority and shall determine all routes of such system. The board shall, subject to subdivision (19) of section 18-812, fix all rates, fares, and charges for transportation on such system.

Laws 2019, LB492, § 23.